District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1216

Franchise renewal procedure.

Repealed.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 17, formerly § 16, 29 DCR 2872
renumbered and amended Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(v), 30 DCR 4289
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(o), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334

History

1981 Ed., § 43-1816.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).

Emergency Legislation

Mayor's Orders

Extension of the Franchise Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see Mayor’s Order 2000-144, September 22, 2000 ( 47 DCR 8256).

Extension of the Franchise Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see Mayor’s Order 2000-156, October 12, 2000 ( 47 DCR 8682) and Mayor’s Order 2000-169, November 2, 2000 ( 47 DCR 9536).

Extension of the Term of the Interim Open Video Systems Agreement with Starpower Communications, LLC, see Mayor’s Order 2000-175, November 21, 2000 ( 47 DCR 9545).

Extension of the Franchise Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see Mayor’s Order 2001-09, January 16, 2001 ( 48 DCR 946).

Extension of the Franchise Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see Mayor’s Order 2001-10, January 17, 2001( 48 DCR 947).

Extension of the Term of the Interim Open Video Systems Agreement with Starpower Communications, LLC, see Mayor’s Order 2001-11, January 17, 2001 ( 48 DCR 948).

Extension of the Term of the Interim Open Video Systems Agreement with Starpower Communications, LLC, see Mayor’s Order 2001-25, February 14, 2001 ( 48 DCR 2178).

Extension of the Franchise Term of District Cablevision Limited Partnership, see Mayor’s Order 2001-26, February 14, 2001 (48 DCR